Illinois, session 104th, HB2269.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Child Passenger Protection Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 25/1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1101)7    Sec. 1. Title and citation. This Act shall be known and and 8may be cited as the "Child Passenger Protection Act".9(Source: P.A. 83-8.)